Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.910

Effective dates—2002 c 354.

(1) Sections 203, 204, 213 through 223, 227, 229 through 231, 241, 243, 246, 248, 301 through 307, 309 through 316, 318, 319, and 402 of this act take effect July 1, 2004.

(2) Section 224 of this act takes effect March 15, 2005.

(3) Sections 208, 234 through 238, and 403 of this act take effect July 1, 2005.

(4) Sections 225, 226, 233, and 404 of this act take effect July 1, 2006.

[ 2002 c 354 s 411.]